en: Winged beans, Goa beans, Asparagus peas
fr: Haricots ailé, Pois carré
hr: Krilati grah
ja: シカクマメ, 四角豆
la: Psophocarpus tetragonolobus
nl: Vleugelbonen

en: snow peas
fr: Pois mange-tout, Pois gourmand

en: Snow peas boiled in water, Snow peas cooked in water
fr: Pois mange-tout bouillis, Pois mange-tout cuits à l'eau, Pois gourmands bouillis, Pois gourmandscuits à l'eau

en: Cooked snow peas
fr: Pois mange-tout cuits, Pois gourmands cuits

en: Soy beans, Soy, Soya, Whole soybean grain
bg: Соя
de: Soja
es: Soja
fi: soija
fr: Fèves de soja, Soja, Soja graine entière
hr: Zrna soje
ja: 大豆, ダイズ, だいず
la: Glycine max
nl: Soja
ru: Соя, Семена сои

en: Dried soy beans, Dried Soy, Dried Soya
fr: Fèves de soja séchées, Soja séché

en: Edamame
xx: Edamame
ja: 枝豆, エダマメ

en: Canned edamame
fr: Edamame en conserve
hr: Konzervirani edamame
nl: Edamame in blik

en: Frozen edamame
fr: Edamame surgelés
hr: Smrznuti edamame
nl: Diepvries-edamame

en: Canned legumes
ca: Llegums en conserva
de: Hülsenfrüchte in Dosen
es: Leguminosas en conserva, Legumbres en conserva
fi: purkitetut palkokasvit
fr: Légumineuses en conserve
hr: Konzervirane mahunarke
hu: Hüvelyes konzervek
it: Legumi in scatola
nl: Bonen in blik/pot
pt: Legumes enlatados
ru: Бобовые в консервах
zh: 罐装豆类

en: Canned chickpeas, Canned chick peas
bg: Консервиран нахут
da: Dåsekikærter, Kikærter på dåse
de: Kichererbsen in Dosen
es: Garbanzos cocidos en conserva, Garbanzos en conserva
fi: purkitetut kikherneet
fr: Pois chiches en conserve, Pois chiche appertisés
hr: Konzervirani slanutak
it: Ceci in scatola
nl: Kikkererwten in blik/pot
pl: Ciecierzyca konserwowa, Ciecierzyca w puszce
pt: Grão-de-bico em lata

en: Canned black chickpeas, Canned black chick peas
da: Sorte kikærter på dåse

en: Canned common beans, Canned string beans, Canned beans
bg: Боб от консерва
de: Bohnenkonserven, Dosenbohnen, Bohnen in der Dose, Bohnen aus der Dose
es: Alubias cocidas en conserva, Alubias en conserva, Judías en conserva
fi: purkitetut pavut
fr: Haricots en conserve
hr: Konzervirani obični grah
it: Fagioli in scatola
nl: Gewone bonen in blik/pot
pt: Feijões comuns em lata
ru: Бобы в консервах

en: Canned flageolet beans
es: Flageolets en conserva
fr: Flageolets en conserve, Flageolets appertisés égouttés, Flageolets en conserve égouttés, Haricots flageolets appertisés, Haricots flageolets en conserve égouttés
hr: Konzervirani flageolet grah
nl: Flageoletbonen in blik/pot

en: Canned red kidney beans
bg: Червен боб от консерва
de: Kidneybohnen in Dosen
es: Alubias rojas cocidas en conserva
fi: purkitettuja kidneypapuja
fr: Haricots rouges en conserve, Haricots rouges appertisés
hr: Konzervirani crveni grah
it: Fagioli comuni in scatola
nl: Rode bonen in blik/pot

en: Canned white common beans, Canned haricot beans
bg: Бял боб от консерва
de: Weiße Bohnen in Dosen
es: Alubias blancas cocidas en conserva
fi: Säilykkeet valkoiset tavalliset pavut
fr: Haricots blancs en conserve, Haricots blancs appertisés
hr: Konzervirani bijeli obični grah
it: Fagioli bianchi in scatola
nl: Witte bonen in blik/pot

en: Canned lentils
bg: Леща от консерва
de: Linsenkonserven, Dosenlinsen
es: Lentejas cocidas en conserva, Lentejas en conserva
fi: purkitettuja linssejä
fr: Lentilles en conserve
hr: Konzervirana leća
it: Lenticchie in scatola
nl: Linzen in blik/pot
pt: Lentilhas em lata

en: Canned seasoned lentils
fr: Lentilles cuisinées en conserve, Lentilles cuisinées appertisées

en: Canned scarlet runner beans, Canned runner beans, Canned multiflora beans
es: Judiones cocidos en conserva, Judiones de la Granja cocidos en conserva
fr: Haricots d'Espagne en conserve, Haricots écarlates en conserve
hr: Konzervirani grimizni grah
nl: Pronkbonen in blik/pot

en: Canned green beans, Canned French beans
bg: Зелен фасул от консерва
de: Grüne Bohnen in Dosen
es: Judías verdes en conserva
fi: purkitettuja vihreitä papuja
fr: Haricots verts en conserve, Haricots verts appertisés égouttés
hr: Zelene mahune iz konzerve
it: Fagiolini in scatola
nl: Sperziebonen in blik/pot
pt: Feijões verdes em lata